Washington statutes.
RCW 43.147.080

PNWER-Net working subgroup—Gifts, grants, donations.

The PNWER-Net working group may accept gifts, grants, and donations from private individuals and entities made for the purposes of RCW 43.147.040 through 43.147.070.

[ 1993 c 485 s 5.]